Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-9208
Examination; fee.

(1) An individual applying for a resident public adjuster license shall pass a written examination, unless exempt pursuant to section 44-9209. Such examination shall test the knowledge of the individual concerning the duties and responsibilities of a public adjuster and the insurance laws and regulations of this state and shall be conducted as prescribed by the director.

(2) The director may make arrangements, including contracting with an outside testing service, for administering the written examination required pursuant to subsection (1) of this section and collecting a fee prescribed by the director. The fee shall not exceed one hundred dollars.

Laws 2018, LB743, § 8.